Hawaii, session 2026, HB188.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $33,955,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the purpose of capital improvement projects for the twenty-second representative district, as follows: 1.   Hokulani elementary school Plans, design, and construction for a shade structure. Plans                           $12,000 Design                          $13,000 Construction                   $250,000 Total funding                       $275,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 2.   Noelani elementary school Plans, design, and construction for replacement of the current kindergarten portable classroom. Plans                          $250,000 Design                         $250,000 Construction                 $5,000,000 Total funding                     $5,500,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 3.   Manoa elementary school Plans, design, and construction for perimeter chain link fence for enhanced security. Plans                           $25,000 Design                          $25,000 Construction                   $500,000 Total funding                       $550,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 4.   Manoa public library Plans, design, and construction for replacement of the elevator. Plans                           $15,000 Design                          $15,000 Construction                   $300,000 Total funding                       $330,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 5.   University of Hawaii at Manoa Plans and design for phase 1 of a new central administration office and 1,500-stall parking structure on the upper campus. Plans                        $4,500,000 Design                       $4,500,000 Total funding                     $9,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the University of Hawaii. 6.   University of Hawaii at Manoa Construction for the demolition of Hale Noelani housing. Construction                 $6,500,000 Total funding                     $6,500,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the University of Hawaii. 7.   University of Hawaii at Manoa Construction for phase 2 of the track and field and soccer stadium complex, including a new video board, concession stands, storage, locker rooms, meeting rooms, photovoltaic shade canopies, sound system, and lighting. Construction                 $9,000,000 Total funding                     $9,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the university of Hawaii. 8.   University of Hawaii at Manoa Construction for improvements to the Stan Sheriff center, including replacing pull risers, replacing taraflex volleyball court, and installing new handrails for spectator safety. Construction                 $2,800,000 Total funding                     $2,800,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the university of Hawaii. SECTION 2.  The appropriation made for the capital improvement projects authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made; provided that all moneys from the appropriation unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________